District of Columbia statutes.
4-1305.02

Criminal records check required for certain individuals.

The following individuals shall apply for a criminal records check under this part:

(1)

An individual who seeks to be approved or licensed as an adoptive parent by the Agency or by any licensed child-placing agency;

(2)

An individual who seeks to be approved or licensed as a foster parent by the Agency or by any licensed child-placing agency;

(3)

An individual who seeks to be approved as a kinship caregiver or legal guardian by the Agency;

(4)

Except as provided in paragraph (1) of this section, an individual who seeks to become an adoptive parent of a child under Chapter 3 of Title 16;

(5)

Upon order of a judicial officer, an individual with whom a child is placed under § 16-2320(a)(2) or § 16-2320(a)(3)(C); and

(6)

An adult residing in the home of an individual described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section or, upon order of a judicial officer, an adult who resides in the home of an individual described in paragraph (5) of this section.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title V, § 502, formerly § 322
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 201(f), 47 DCR 2850
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 2(s), 48 DCR 2043
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 22(a)(3), 53 DCR 6794
This section is referenced in § 4-1305.03, § 4-1305.07, and § 4-1305.08.
D.C. Law 13-277 substituted “Agency” for “Department” throughout the section; and, in par. (3), substituted “Agency” for “Division”.
D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 4-1305.01.
For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.